src/bxr.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Gen +Ins +Dat +Com +Abl

LEXICON Root

буряад numlex ;
гар  numlex ;
улас numlex ;
Байгал numlex ;

LEXICON numlex
+N+Sg:  caselex ;
+N+Pl:ууд caselex ;

LEXICON caselex
+Nom: # ;
+Acc:ые # ;
+Gen:ай # ;
+Dat:да # ;
+Dat:та # ;
+Ins:аар # ;
+Com:тай # ;
+Abl:һаа # ;
